Indiana, session 2026, HB1371.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-24-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 20. Unique Background Colors for Certain Licenses,
Permits, and Identification Cards
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to:
(1) a driver's license;
(2) a learner's permit; and
(3) an identification card;
issued by the bureau after December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. (a) The bureau shall designate and apply a unique
background color to a driver's license, a learner's permit, or an
identification card issued to an individual who:
(1) is an alien with lawful status, as defined in
IC 9-13-2-92.3(2); or
(2) is not registered to vote at the time of issuance.
(b) All other aspects of a driver's license, a learner's permit, or
2026 IN 1371—LS 6977/DI 137


an identification card with a unique background color under
subsection (a) must be the same as a driver's license, a learner's
permit, or an identification card typically issued by the bureau.
Sec. 3. Not later than thirty (30) days after the bureau receives
a completed online voter registration under IC 3-7-26.7 from an
individual who was previously issued a driver's license, a learner's
permit, or an identification card with a unique background color
under section 2 of this chapter, the bureau must notify the
individual that the individual is eligible for a new driver's license,
learner's permit, or identification card.
2026 IN 1371—LS 6977/DI 137